District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.91

Solid Waste Disposal Cost Recovery Special Account.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Solid Waste Disposal Cost Recovery Special Account, into which shall be deposited all solid waste disposal transfer fee and disposal fee revenues, less any recycling surcharge, owed and accruing to the District.

(b)

All funds deposited into the Solid Waste Disposal Cost Recovery Special Account shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

(c)

The Solid Waste Disposal Cost Recovery Special Account shall be used to defray the expenses of operating, maintaining, and improving the District’s solid waste transfer facilities, and to dispose of solid waste delivered to those facilities.

Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 6013, 54 DCR 7052
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9099, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 8006, 59 DCR 8025
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (a), substituted “lapsing” for “nonlapsing”; and, in subsec. (b), substituted “be used for the purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section. Any monies not expended at the end of a fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.” for “not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.”
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “nonlapsing” for “lapsing” in (a); and in (b), substituted “not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress” for “be used for the purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section” and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Any monies not expended at the end of a fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.”
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6013 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8006 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-383, June 19, 2012, 59 DCR 7764).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8006 of Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
Short title: Section 6011 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle B of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Solid Waste Disposal Cost Recovery Act of 2007”.
Section 8010 of D.C. Law 19-168 provided that §§ 8002, 8003, 8004, 8005, 8006, and 8007 of the act shall apply as of September 14, 2011.